src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh        FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>en         FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1  ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie     FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme        FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h         FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lg:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»eldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»eldahk flagLDAHKE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»eldh R ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»eld FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 +V+TV:            BÅÅHKEDH ;
  +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     SOVVEDH  ;
!   +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall    SOVVEDH  ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
  +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»elg       LGIDH    ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs

LEXICON SÅÅJHTEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV: SÅÅJHTEDH_CONT ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;



LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                +V+IV:            BÅÅHKEDH     ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;


LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row E - Group V
                       +Ind+Prs:%>               VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS  ;
                       +Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-PRT         ;
                         +Imprt:%>               VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                           +Inf:%>edh            FINAL1           ;
                          +VGen:%>en             FINAL1           ;
! +Act:%>eme    FINAL1 ;
                           +Ger:%>eminie         FINAL1           ;
                        +PrsPrc:%>ije            flagFINAL1           ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
                        +PrfPrc:%>eme            FINAL1           ;
                        +ConNeg:%>h              FINAL1           ;
! Derivations
! -----------
                +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij  flagN_ODD            ;
               +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd        ;
                  +Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l             LES              ;
              +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»egået          GÅETEDH          ;
              +Der1+Der/st+V:%»est            DÅAJVOEHTIDH     ;
               +Der1+Der/l+V:%»el             GOLTELIDH        ;
                +Der1+Der/ht:%»eht            DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV  ;
! +Der1+Der/Caus:%»edeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
              +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ejahtj         AHTJE            ;
               +Der1+Der/d+V:%»ed             GOLTELIDH        ;
              +Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»eldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP         ;
               +Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»eldahk         flagLDAHKE           ;
       +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»eldh           R                ;
         +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh           flagFINAL1           ;
 +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»eld            flagFINAL1           ; !

LEXICON SÅÅJHTEDH_CONT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row E - Group V
         +Ind+Prs:%>               VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS ;
         +Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-PRT        ;
! +Imprt:%>       VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
             +Inf:%>edh            FINAL1          ;
! +VGen:%>en    FINAL1 ;
! +Act:%>eme    FINAL1 ;
             +Ger:%>eminie         FINAL1          ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ije FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
          +PrfPrc:%>eme            FINAL1          ;
          +ConNeg:%>h              FINAL1          ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd       ;
! +Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l LES ;
! +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»egået GÅETEDH ;
! +Der1+Der/st+V:%»est DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/l+V:%»el GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/ht:%»eht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
! +Der1+Der/Caus:%»edeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
! +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ejahtj AHTJE ;
! +Der1+Der/d+V:%»ed GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»eldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
! +Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»eldahk flagLDAHKE ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»eldh R ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»eld FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON VÅÅJNEDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>               VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS  ;
          +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-PRT         ;
            +V+IV+Imprt:%>               VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
              +V+IV+Inf:%>edh            FINAL1           ;
             +V+IV+VGen:%>en             FINAL1           ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme    FINAL1 ;
              +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie         FINAL1           ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
           +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme            FINAL1           ; !@C.NeedNoun@ ?
           +V+IV+ConNeg:%>h              FINAL1           ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd        ;
     +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l             LES              ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»egået          GÅETEDH          ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V:%»est            DÅAJVOEHTIDH     ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V:%»el             GOLTELIDH        ;
   +V+IV+Der1+Der/ht:%»eht            DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV  ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/Caus:%»edeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ejahtj         AHTJE            ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V:%»ed             GOLTELIDH        ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lg:%»elg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»eldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»eldahk flagLDAHKE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»eldh R ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»eld FINAL1 ; !

! passiv Der/d = dovvedh.


LEXICON GÖÖLEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                  +V+TV:            GÖÖLEDH  ;
   +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     SOVVEDH  ;
!   +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ; ! No short passives in Group VI
  +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»ehtall    SOVVEDH  ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
      +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»elg       LGIDH    ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs


LEXICON GÖÖLEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 +V+IV:            GÖÖLEDH      ;
       +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ; ! No short passives in Group VI
